New York, session 2025-2026, S7977.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 220-a to read as follows: 3 § 220-a. Definitions. For the purposes of this article, on and after 4 the effective date of this section: 5 1. The term "landlord" shall be expanded to include cooperative enti- 6 ties. 7 2. The term "tenant" shall be expanded to include any shareholder, 8 tenant or subtenant of a cooperative entity. 9 3. The term "cooperative entity" shall mean a corporation, entity, or 10 organization that is operating for the purpose of or is providing hous- 11 ing or residences for its shareholders by leasing or subleasing to such 12 shareholders, under proprietary leases or occupancy agreements, or 13 subleases of such leases or occupancy agreements, of apartments or resi- 14 dences in buildings or premises owned by such corporation, entity, or 15 organization. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11825-01-5